Florida, session 2026, HB4011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
9
10 Section 1. Section 1 of section 3 of chapter 2003-365,
11 Laws of Florida, as amended by chapter 2013-255, Laws of
12 Florida, is amended to read:
13 Section 1. District boundaries.—A special taxing district,
14 lying wholly in St. Lucie County, to be known as the St. Lucie
15 County Mosquito Control District, is described as follows:
16
17 SECTIONS 1 THROUGH 4, 9 THROUGH 12, 13 THROUGH 16, 21
18 THROUGH 24, 25 THROUGH 28, 33 THROUGH 36, TOWNSHIP 34
19 SOUTH, RANGE 38 EAST;
20
21 AND
22
23 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 34 SOUTH, RANGE 39
24 EAST;
25
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
26 AND
27
28 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 34 SOUTH, RANGE 40
29 EAST;
30
31 AND
32
33 SECTIONS 1 THROUGH 4, 9 THROUGH 12, 13 THROUGH 16, 21
34 THROUGH 24, 25 THROUGH 28, 33 THROUGH 36, TOWNSHIP 35
35 SOUTH, RANGE 38 EAST;
36
37 AND
38
39 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 35 SOUTH, RANGE 39
40 EAST;
41
42 AND
43
44 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 35 SOUTH, RANGE 40
45 EAST;
46
47 AND
48
49 ALL OF THE GOVERNMENT LOTS AND FRACTIONAL SECTIONS OF
50 TOWNSHIP 35 SOUTH, RANGE 41 EAST,
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
51
52 AND
53
54 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 36 SOUTH, RANGE 38
55 EAST,
56
57 LESS AND EXCEPT THE NORTHERLY PART OF SECTIONS 5 AND 6
58 BOUNDED ON THE SOUTH BY THE CENTERLINE OF THE
59 OKEECHOBEE ROAD, ALSO KNOWN AS STATE ROAD 70;
60
61 AND
62
63 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 36 SOUTH, RANGE 39
64 EAST;
65
66 AND
67
68 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 36 SOUTH, RANGE 40
69 EAST;
70
71 AND
72
73 ALL OF THE GOVERNMENT LOTS AND FRACTIONAL SECTIONS OF
74 TOWNSHIP 36 SOUTH, RANGE 41 EAST;
75
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
76 AND
77
78 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 37 SOUTH, RANGE 38
79 EAST;
80
81 AND
82
83 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 37 SOUTH, RANGE 39
84 EAST;
85
86 AND
87
88 ALL OF THE SECTIONS OF TOWNSHIP 37 SOUTH, RANGE 40
89 EAST
90
91 LESS AND EXCEPT THE LANDS UNDER MARTIN COUNTY
92 JURISDICTION;
93
94 AND
95
96 SECTIONS 2 THROUGH 6, 7 THROUGH 12, TOWNSHIP 37 SOUTH,
97 RANGE 41 EAST.
98
99 ALL AREAS BOUNDED ON THE EAST BY WATERS OF THE
100 ATLANTIC OCEAN WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF THE ST.
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
101 LUCIE COUNTY, FLORIDA.
102
103 THE TOTAL AREA CONTAINS 287,827.904 ACRES, MORE OR
104 LESS.
105
106 Beginning at the Northeast corner of Section 3,
107 Township 34 South, Range 40 East; thence West to the
108 Northwest corner of Section 3, Township 34 South,
109 Range 38 East; thence South to the Southwest corner of
110 Section 34, Township 34 South, Range 38 East; thence
111 East to the Southwest corner of Section 36, Township
112 34 South, Range 38 East; thence South to the Southeast
113 corner of Northeast 1/4 of Section 11, Township 36
114 South, Range 38 East; thence West to the Northwest
115 corner of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 11, Township 36
116 South, Range 38 East; thence South to the Southwest
117 corner of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 11, Township 36
118 South, Range 38 East; thence East to the Southwest
119 corner of Section 10, Township 36 South, Range 39
120 East; thence South to the Southwest corner of Section
121 34, Township 37 South, Range 39 East; thence East to
122 the Southeast corner of Section 36, Township 37 South,
123 Range 40 East; thence North on the east line of said
124 Section 36 and Section 25, Township 37 South, Range 40
125 East, 6,459 feet to a point lying within the water
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
126 body of the North Fork of the St. Lucie River; thence
127 departing said line within the North Fork of the St.
128 Lucie River a bearing direction (State Plane
129 Coordinate System, Florida East Zone) of N 41° 04′ W,
130 a distance of 6,155 feet, more or less, to a point
131 lying within the water body of the North Fork of the
132 St. Lucie River; thence departing said point a bearing
133 direction (State Plane Coordinate System, Florida East
134 Zone) N 45° 16′ East, a distance of 2,355 feet, more
135 or less, to a point intersecting with the north shore
136 of the North Fork of the St. Lucie River and the west
137 edge of the Howard Creek as concurrent with the City
138 of Port St. Lucie municipal boundary limits; thence
139 departing said intersecting shore and edge lines
140 following along the City of Port St. Lucie municipal
141 boundary line north along the west edge of Howard
142 Creek to the south line of the northeast quarter of
143 Section 24, Township 37 South, Range 40 East; thence
144 East along said south line of the northeast quarter to
145 the intersection of the east 924.15 feet of Section
146 24, Township 37 South, Range 40 East; thence North
147 along said east 924.15-foot line of Section 24,
148 Township 37 South, Range 40 East, to the intersection
149 of the north line of the south 508.15 feet of the
150 northeast quarter of Section 24, Township 37 South,
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
151 Range 40 East; thence East along said south 508.15-
152 foot line of the northeast quarter of said Section 24,
153 Township 37 South, Range forty East, to an
154 intersection with the East line of Township thirty-
155 seven South, Range 40 East; thence North along the
156 east line of Sections 24 and 13, Township 37 South,
157 Range 41 East to the southwest corner of Section 7,
158 Township 37 South, Range 41 East; thence East
159 following the Section lines to the water's edge of the
160 Atlantic Ocean; thence meandering said water's edge
161 Northwesterly to the point of beginning.
162
163 AND
164
165 Aero Acres Subdivision as recorded in Plat Book 27 at
166 pages 14 thru 14D of the public records of St. Lucie
167 County, Florida.
168
169 AND
170
171 A parcel of land of land lying in Sections 4, 5, 8, 9,
172 10, 16 and 17, Township 37 South, Range 39 East, and
173 Section 33, Township 36 South, Range 39 East, St.
174 Lucie County, Florida, said parcel being more
175 particularly described as follows:
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
176
177 Begin at the intersection of the centerline of Gatlin
178 Boulevard (also being the north line of Section 15)
179 and the westerly limits of Gatlin Boulevard Right-of-
180 Way and the westerly limits of those lands described
181 in an Order of Taking dated July 24, 1979 and recorded
182 in Official Record Book 311 at Pages 2946 through
183 2952, inclusive, Public Records of St. Lucie County,
184 Florida, and as shown on the Florida Department of
185 Transportation Right-of-Way maps for State Road #9.
186 (I-95), Section 94001-2412, dated 6/2/77, with last
187 revision of 9/11/79; thence South 89 degrees 57
188 minutes 05 seconds West, a distance of 7702.12 feet;
189 thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 46 seconds West, a
190 distance of 757.53 feet; thence South 89 degrees 57
191 minutes 43 seconds West, a distance of 1159.20 feet;
192 thence North 00 degrees 40 minutes 03 seconds East, a
193 distance of 152.60 feet; thence North 54 degrees 52
194 minutes 19 seconds East, a distance of 153.89 feet;
195 thence North 11 degrees 24 minutes 07 seconds East, a
196 distance of 156.51 feet; thence North 14 degrees 02
197 minutes 38 seconds West, a distance of 439.20 feet; to
198 the beginning of a curve concave southerly, having a
199 radius of 200.00 feet and a central angle of 130
200 degrees 29 minutes 58 seconds, thence northerly,
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
201 westerly and finally southerly along the arc of said
202 curve to the left, a distance of 455.53 feet to the
203 curves end; thence South 35 degrees 27 minutes 24
204 seconds West, a distance of 161.00 feet; thence South
205 89 degrees 57 minutes 05 seconds West, a distance of
206 1118.66 feet; thence North 43 degrees 15 minutes 34
207 seconds West, a distance of 1.86 feet; thence North 09
208 degrees 54 minutes 33 seconds East, a distance of
209 528.17 feet; thence North 62 degrees 56 minutes 57
210 seconds East, a distance of 710.69 feet; thence North
211 39 degrees 35 minutes 38 seconds West, a distance of
212 373.81 feet; thence South 80 degrees 50 minutes 18
213 seconds West, a distance of 92.33 feet; thence North
214 00 degrees 09 minutes 21 seconds East, A distance of
215 4587.82 feet; to the southeasterly line of Grove No.
216 3, as recorded in O.R. Book 383, at Page 1059, St.
217 Lucie County Public Records (Special Warranty Deed
218 from A. Duda & Sons, Inc. to D & M Indian River
219 Groves) thence along said southerly and easterly line
220 of Grove No. 3 the following courses and distances:
221 North 74 degrees 07 minutes 42 seconds East, a
222 distance of 3624.15 feet; thence North 02 degrees 40
223 minutes 30 seconds West; a distance of 853.63 feet;
224 thence North 03 degrees 34 minutes 36 seconds East, a
225 distance of 264.67 feet; thence North 11 degrees 39
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
226 minutes 14 seconds East, a distance of 299.59 feet;
227 thence North 05 degrees 52 minutes 55 seconds East, a
228 distance of 655.21 feet; thence North 13 degrees 31
229 minutes 07 seconds East, a distance of 422.94 feet;
230 thence departing said Grove No. 3, continue North 13
231 degrees 31 minutes 07 seconds East, a distance of
232 51.88 feet; thence North 74 degrees 14 minutes 30
233 seconds East; a distance of 2525.46 feet; thence North
234 76 degrees 04 minutes 00 seconds East, a distance of
235 1244.50 feet; thence North 65 degrees 11 minutes 40
236 seconds East, a distance of 178.59 feet; thence North
237 59 degrees 06 minutes 39 seconds East, a distance of
238 424.13 feet; thence North 73 degrees 43 minutes 15
239 seconds East, a distance of 14.12 feet; thence South
240 50 degrees 55 minutes 52 seconds East, a distance of
241 7.43 feet; thence North 56 degrees 01 minutes 38
242 seconds East, a distance of 31.64 feet; thence North
243 33 degrees 56 minutes 01 seconds East, a distance of
244 30.15 feet; thence North 54 degrees 34 minutes 18
245 seconds East, a distance of 298.73 feet; thence North
246 85 degrees 53 minutes 58 seconds East, a distance of
247 132.02 feet; thence North 70 degrees 54 minutes 26
248 seconds East, a distance of 143.67 feet; thence North
249 56 degrees 25 minutes 29 seconds East, a distance of
250 121.35 feet; thence North 66 degrees 21 minutes 07
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
251 seconds East, a distance of 557.84 feet; thence South
252 00 degrees 35 minutes 12 seconds West along the
253 northerly prolongation of the East line of the
254 northeast quarter of said Section 4, a distance of
255 271.44 feet to the northeast corner of Section 4;
256 thence continue South 00 degrees 35 minutes 12 seconds
257 West, along the East line of said Section 4, a
258 distance of 2833.04 feet to the East quarter corner of
259 said Section 4; thence South 00 degrees 36 minutes 27
260 seconds West, a distance of 2651.97 feet to the
261 northwest corner of Section 10; thence North 89
262 degrees 54 minutes 10 seconds East along the North
263 line of said Section 10, a distance of 1793.84 feet;
264 to a point of intersection with the westerly Right-of-
265 Way line of said I-95 and the said westerly line of
266 the lands described in the Order of Taking dated July
267 24, 1979 and recorded in Official Record Book 311 at
268 Pages 2946 through 2952, inclusive, and with a non-
269 tangent curve, concave easterly, having a radius of
270 5983.58 feet and central angle of 23 degrees 41
271 minutes 41 seconds, thence along the westerly line of
272 said I-95 Right-of-Way and along the said westerly
273 line of the lands described in the Order of Taking,
274 dated July 24, 1979, the following courses and
275 distance: thence southerly along the arc of said curve
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
276 to the left, a distance of 2474.52 feet, said arc
277 subtended by a chord which bears South 06 degrees 56
278 minutes 28 seconds East, a distance of 2456.92 feet to
279 the curves end; thence South 18 degrees 47 minutes 19
280 seconds East, a distance of 714.03 feet; thence South
281 14 degrees 47 minutes 19 seconds East, a distance of
282 510.88 feet; thence South 07 degrees 32 minutes 07
283 seconds East, a distance of 374.37 feet; thence South
284 06 degrees 58 minutes 16 seconds West, a distance of
285 373.49 feet; thence South 15 degrees 33 minutes 28
286 seconds West, a distance of 491.49 feet; thence South
287 34 degrees 39 minutes 50 seconds West, a distance of
288 207.78 feet; thence South 70 degrees 02 minutes 50
289 seconds West, a distance of 289.50 feet; thence South
290 00 degrees 01 minutes 45 seconds West, a distance of
291 64.09 feet; thence South 82 degrees 24 minutes 53
292 seconds West, a distance of 317.56 feet; thence North
293 89 degrees 58 minutes 15 seconds West, a distance of
294 372.63 feet; thence North 89 degrees 58 minutes 15
295 seconds West, a distance of 262.61 feet; thence South
296 00 degrees 01 minutes 45 seconds West, a distance of
297 100.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.
298
299 AND
300
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
301 A parcel of land of land lying in Section 16, 20, 21,
302 28, 29 and 33, Township 36 South, Range 39 East, St.
303 Lucie County, Florida, said parcel being more
304 particularly described as follows:
305
306 Begin at the intersection of the Southeasterly right
307 of way line of the FEC Railroad and the Northeasterly
308 right of way line of the SFWMD Canal C-24; thence
309 Southeasterly along said Northeasterly right of way
310 line of the C-24 to the intersection of the East Line
311 of Section 33, Township 36 South, Range 39 East;
312 thence North along the East line of Sections 33, 28,
313 21 AND 16, Township 36 South, Range 39 East to the
314 intersection of the Southeasterly right of way line of
315 the FEC Railroad; thence Southwesterly along said
316 Southeasterly right of way line to the Point of
317 Beginning.
318
319 AND
320
321 Sections 19, 20, 21, 28 and 33, Township 37 south,
322 Range 39 East.
323
324 AND
325
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4011 2026 Legislature
326 All that part of Sections 16, 17, and 18, Township 37
327 South, Range 39 East lying 23 feet south of the North
328 line of lands described in Orb 477, Page 560 of the
329 Public Records of St. Lucie County, Florida.
330 Section 2. Referendum.—The Supervisor of Elections for St.
331 Lucie County shall conduct a referendum on November 3, 2026, at
332 the 2026 General Election of those qualified electors within the
333 areas proposed to be added to the St. Lucie County Mosquito
334 Control District as described in section 1 of this act, in
335 accordance with the Florida Election Code, on the question of
336 whether the St. Lucie County Mosquito Control District is
337 authorized to provide all services and exercise all powers and
338 authority as provided under its charter within the areas
339 described in section 1 of this act.
340 Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its approval by
341 a majority vote of those qualified electors within the areas
342 proposed to be added to the St. Lucie County Mosquito Control
343 District as described in section 1 of this act voting in a
344 referendum held pursuant to this act on the referendum question
345 in section 2, except that this section and section 2 of this act
346 shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4011 -00-er